Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1141.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
(a) Any residential property qualifying low-income housing that has been issued an
occupancy permit on or after January 1, 1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S.
Department of Housing and Urban Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the
land records in favor of a governmental unit or the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation restricting either or both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or and
the incomes of the occupants of the property, is subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of
the property’s previous years’ gross scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined
by each municipality.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “qualifying low-income housing” shall mean:
(1) A low income unit, as defined in 26 USC § 42(i)(3) on January 1, 2025, in a qualified
low-income housing project, as defined in 26 USC § 42(g) on January 1, 2025; or
(2) Affordable housing, as defined in § 42-128-8.1(d)(1) on January 1, 2025, approved for
tax treatment under this section as of December 31, 2024.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003031
========
LC003031 - Page 2 of 3